src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! +Idf is no longer used with base form .. just +DefArt after article ...
!**************************************************************************
!! Moirfeolaíocht na nAinmfhocail Gaeilge (Morphology of Irish Nouns)
!**************************************************************************
!**************************************************************************  
!
!		C O N T I N U A T I O N     C L A S S E S
!
!**************************************************************************  
!!!LEXICON GuessNoun
!!!^GUESSNOUN	Nf2-SINGULAR;
!!!^GUESSNOUN	Nm1-1;
!!!^GUESSNOUN	Nf3-3;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------    
!! FEMININE NOUN continuation classes
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------    
!! Weak Plurals : 
!! Broad singular is made slender; plural already broad

LEXICON Nf2-SINGULAR

+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D2;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nf2a-SINGULAR

+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D2a;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

! not used
! beithir - beithre (gs) Sync + e
!LEXICON Nf2b-SINGULAR
!+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
!+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G^Coim	Gen-sg-D2;
!+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nf2-1 
Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak:^G	PL-TADA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)A;

!GS tintreach - tintrí
LEXICON Nf2-1a 
Nf2a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak:^G	PL-TADA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)A;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------

!! Weak Plurals : Broaden 

!! Singular already slender; plural is made broad



LEXICON Nf2-2
Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak:^G	PL-LEATHNÚ;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)A;

!! Weak Plurals : 

LEXICON Nf2-3

!! Weak Plurals : 
Nf2-SINGULAR;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(CAOL)E;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak:^G	PL-LEATHNÚ;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(CAOL)E;

LEXICON Nf2-4

Nf2a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Weak:^G	PL-TADA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)A;

!! STRONG PLURALS


LEXICON Nf2-5

Nf2-SINGULAR;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-TE;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-TE;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-TE;


!! STRONG PLURALS

LEXICON Nf2-6

Nf2-SINGULAR;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ANNA;

!! STRONG PLURALS

LEXICON Nf2-7

Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-Í;

!! STRONG PLURALS

LEXICON Nf2-8

Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ACHA;

!! STRONG PLURALS

! not used
!LEXICON Nf2a-8
! Gen Sg = Sync + Slen + e
!Nf2b-SINGULAR;
!+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ACHA;
!+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G		PL-(E)ACHA;
!+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ACHA;

!! STRONG PLURALS

LEXICON Nf2-9

Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)THA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(LEA)THA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)THA;


LEXICON Nf2-10

Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-TA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-TA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-TA;

LEXICON Nf2-11

Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ANTA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ANTA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ANTA;


LEXICON Nf2-12

Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)A;

LEXICON Nf2-13

Nf2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(CAOL)E;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G		PL-(CAOL)E;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(CAOL)E;


!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! 3rd Declension
!
!! Strong Plurals : +aí

!! an bheannacht -> na beannachtaí


LEXICON Nf3-SINGULAR
+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D3;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nf3a-SINGULAR
+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C		Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G^Ath	Gen-sg-D3;	! EXCEPTION t-> th,  t->[], dh ->t
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V		Voc-sg-0;

!! gamhain - gamhna (gs), midheamhain - midheamhna (gs)
LEXICON Nf3b-SINGULAR
+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C		Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G^Coim	Gen-sg-D3;	! SYNC + a 
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V		Voc-sg-0;


LEXICON 	Nf3-1

Nf3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-AÍ;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON 	Nf3-2

Nf3a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath^Lea		PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath^Lea	PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath^Lea		PL-AÍ;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals :  +(e)anna

!! tóin -> tóineanna
!! scoth -> scothanna
!! EXCEPTION: an chuid -> na codanna see FIX file
!! EXCEPTION: an raith -> na rathanna see FIX file
!
LEXICON 	Nf3-3

Nf3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G		PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ANNA;
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON 	Nf3-4	

Nf3a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-Í;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON 	Nf3-5

Nf3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Lea		PL-TA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Lea	PL-TA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Lea		PL-TA;


!--------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON 	Nf3-6

Nf3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G		PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ACHA;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON 	Nf3-6a

Nf3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G		PL-(LEA)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)ACHA;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON 	Nf3-7

Nf3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-TE;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G		PL-TE;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-TE;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals :  Broaden +anna

!! an chuid -> na codanna see FIX file
!! an raith -> na rathanna
!! an laith -> na lathanna
!! an luaith -> na luathanna
!
LEXICON 	Nf3-8

Nf3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Lea		PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Lea		PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Lea		PL-(E)ANNA;
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------


LEXICON 	Nf4-SINGULAR
+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D4;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;


!! Strong Plurals : +í

!! an bhearna -> na bearnaí
!! an eala -> na healaí

LEXICON 	Nf4-1

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-Í;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : Athrú e -> í

!! an aicme -> na haicmí (classes)
!! an táille -> na táillí (fees)

LEXICON 	Nf4-2

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath		PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath	PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath		PL-Í;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : 


LEXICON 	Nf4-3

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath		PL-TE;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath	PL-TE;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath		PL-TE;

LEXICON 	Nf4-4

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath		PL-THE;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath	PL-THE;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath		PL-THE;

LEXICON 	Nf4-5
Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ACHA;


LEXICON 	Nf4-6

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ANNA;

LEXICON 	Nf4-7

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-(E)ANTA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ANTA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-(E)ANTA;

!! various ending in vowel	! plurals +nna
LEXICON 	Nf4-8

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-NNA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-NNA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-NNA;

LEXICON 	Nf4-9

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-ONNA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-ONNA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-ONNA;
